Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.220

Board of adjustment—Appointment—Appointment of zoning adjustor.

The members of a board of adjustment and the zoning adjustor shall be appointed in the same manner as provided for the appointment of commissioners in RCW 36.70.080. One member of the board of adjustment may be an appointee member of the commission.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.220. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 22.]